Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.805

Solicitation for charitable activities of executive branch state employees—Limitations—Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

(1) When soliciting gifts, grants, or donations solely to support the charitable activities of executive branch state employees conducted pursuant to RCW 9.46.0209, the executive branch state officers and executive branch state employees are presumed not to be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift provisions in RCW 42.52.140. However, the gifts, grants, or donations must only be solicited from state employees or businesses and organizations that have no business dealings with the soliciting employee's agency. For the purposes of this subsection, "business dealings" includes being subject to regulation by the agency, having a contractual relationship with the agency, and purchasing goods or services from the agency.

(2) For purposes of this section, activities are deemed to be charitable if the activities are devoted to the purposes authorized under RCW 9.46.0209 for charitable and nonprofit organizations listed in that section, or are in support of the activities of those charitable or nonprofit organizations.

[ 2007 c 452 s 2.]